Illinois, session 104th, HB3361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 3-209 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/3-209)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-209)7    Sec. 3-209. Required posting of information. 8    (a) Every facility shall conspicuously post for display in 9an area of its offices accessible to residents, employees, and 10visitors the following:11        (1) Its current license;12        (2) A description, provided by the Department, of 13    complaint procedures established under this Act and the 14    name, address, and telephone number of a person authorized 15    by the Department to receive complaints;16        (3) A copy of any order pertaining to the facility 17    issued by the Department or a court;18        (4) A list of the material available for public 19    inspection under Section 3-210;20        (5) Phone numbers and websites for rights protection 21    services must be posted in common areas and at the main 22    entrance and provided upon entry and at the request of 23    residents or the resident's representative in accordance   HB3361- 2 -LRB104 10723 BAB 20802 b1    with 42 CFR 483.10(j)(4); and2        (6) The statement "The Illinois Long-Term Care 3    Ombudsman Program is a free resident advocacy service 4    available to the public.".5    In accordance with F574 of the State Operations Manual for 6Long-Term Care Facilities, the administrator shall post for 7all residents and at the main entrance the name, address, and 8telephone number of the appropriate State governmental office 9where complaints may be lodged in language the resident can 10understand, which must include notice of the grievance 11procedure of the facility or program as well as addresses and 12phone numbers for the Office of Health Care Regulation and the 13Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and a website showing the 14information of a facility's ownership. The facility shall 15include a link to the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program's 16website on the home page of the facility's website. 17    (b) A facility that has received a notice of violation for 18a violation of the minimum staffing requirements under Section 193-202.05 shall display, during the period of time the facility 20is out of compliance, a notice stating in Calibri (body) font 21and 26-point type in black letters on an 8.5 by 11 inch white 22paper the following:  23"Notice Dated: ...................24This facility does not currently meet the minimum staffing 25ratios required by law. Posted at the direction of the   HB3361- 3 -LRB104 10723 BAB 20802 b1Illinois Department of Public Health.".  2The notice must be posted, at a minimum, at all publicly used 3exterior entryways into the facility, inside the main entrance 4lobby, and next to any registration desk for easily accessible 5viewing. The notice must also be posted on the main page of the 6facility's website. The Department shall have the discretion 7to determine the gravity of any violation and, taking into 8account mitigating and aggravating circumstances and facts, 9may reduce the requirement of, and amount of time for, posting 10the notice. 11    (c) The posting of information is not required if:12        (1) staffing is at 90% of the minimum staffing 13    requirements before the posting deadline; or14        (2) if a facility has corrected the minimum staffing 15    requirements before the posting deadline. 16(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 102-1080, eff. 1-1-23.)